syllabifier.foma
# ------------------------------------------ #
#                                            #
#    Syllabifier for Brazilian Portuguese    #
#                                            #
# ------------------------------------------ #

# --------------------------------------------------
# Sets of vowels and consonants / consonant clusters
# --------------------------------------------------
def V [ a | e | o | á | é | ó | í | ú | ã | õ | â | ê | ô | à ]; # Vowels
def G [ i | u ]; # Semi-vowels
def CO [ p | t | {ca} | {co} | {cu} | {que} | {qui} | b | d | {ga} | {go} | {gu} | {gue} | {gui} ]; # "Occlusive consonants"
def CF [ f | v | s | {ce} | {ci} | ç | z | ss | ch | j | {ge} | {gi} | x ]; # Fricatives
def CL [ l | r | rr ] .o. ~{lh}; # Liquids
def CN [ m | n ]; # Nasals
def C [ {lh} | {nh} | CO | CF | CF | CL | CN ]; # All consonants and clusters

# -----------
# Preparation
# -----------

# Add "$" in the beginning and the end of a word to simplify writing some rules
def WordStart [..] -> "$" || .#. _;
def WordEnd [..] -> "$" || _ .#.;
def MarkBoundaries WordStart .o. WordEnd;

def Prep MarkBoundaries;

# ------------------
# Rules to syllabify
# ------------------

def VowelsExceptÃÕ V .o. ~[ ã | õ ];
def Rule1Case1 [..] -> "-" || VowelsExceptÃÕ _ V;

def Rule2Case5 [..] -> "-" || V C C _ CO;

def GCNSRLX G | CN | [ s | r | l | x ];
def CNotSH C .o. ~[ s | h ]; # TODO: this originally included "r" but I removed because of "eu-Ro-pa", investigate
def Rule3Case2 [..] -> "-" || V GCNSRLX _ CNotSH;

def Rule4Case1 [..] -> "-" || V _ C C V;

def Rule5Case1 [..] -> "-" || V _ C [V | CL];

def Rule6Case3 [..] -> "-" || C V _ C V;

def WordFinalMNRS [ m | n | r | s ] "$";
def CnotWordFinalMNRS C [0 | {$}] .o. ~WordFinalMNRS;
def Rule7Case4 [..] -> "-" || [C | G] G _ CnotWordFinalMNRS; # TODO: fix; this rule is splitting cais as cai-s

def Rule8Case5 [..] -> "-" || C V G s _ CO;

def Rule9Case4 [..] -> "-" || C V G _ V;

def CV1 ? ? .o. C; # two-letter Cs
def CV2 ? .o. C V; # one-letter C followed by V
def CV [ CV1 | CV2 ];
def Rule1Case30 [..] -> "-" || G V _ CV;

def Rule11Case3 [..] -> "-" || C _ G r C; # TODO: fix ("cairmos")

def CQUGU C | {qu} | {gu};
def CLCNCX CL | CN | c | x;
def HLR h | l | r;
def VHLR V | h | l | r;
def Rule12Case1 [..] -> "-" || CQUGU V _ CLCNCX HLR VHLR;

def notHLR ? .o. ~HLR;
def Rule12Case4 [..] -> "-" || CQUGU V CLCNCX _ notHLR VHLR;

def CLCNI CL | CN | i;
def Rule13Case6 [..] -> "-" || C V CLCNI s _ .#.;
def Rule13Case5 [..] -> "-" || C V CLCNI _; # end of word?

def Rule14Case1a [..] -> "-" || ? a _ a;
def Rule14Case1e [..] -> "-" || ? e _ e;
def Rule14Case1i [..] -> "-" || ? i _ i;
def Rule14Case1o [..] -> "-" || ? o _ o;
def Rule14Case1u [..] -> "-" || ? u _ u;
def Rule14Case1vv [..] -> "-" || ? [V | G] _ [V | G] [V | G]; # TODO: originally defined as only V but with bueiro as example ??
def Rule14Case1 Rule14Case1a .o. Rule14Case1e .o. Rule14Case1i .o. Rule14Case1o .o. Rule14Case1u .o. Rule14Case1vv;

def COFVG CO | f | v | g;
def Rule15Case1 [..] -> "-" || ? V _ COFVG [CL | CO] V;

def Ci C .o. ?* i;
def Rule16Case4 [..] -> "-" || Ci _ [a | o] "$";

# def Rule17Case6 ?*; # TODO: doesn't do anything

def DoubleConsonants [ {ss} | {rr} ];
def Rule18Case1 [..] -> "-" || [C | {qu}] V _ DoubleConsonants;

def Rule18Case2 [..] -> "-" || [C | {qu}] V _ s [C-s];

def Rule18Case5 [..] -> "-" || [C | {qu}] V _ C s CO; # TODO: test

def Rule19Case2 [..] -> "-" || ? V V _ C V;

def Rule19Case1 [..] -> "-" || ? V V _ C [?-V]; # TODO: test

# All rules in the other they should be applied
def AllRules Rule1Case1 .o. Rule2Case5 .o. Rule3Case2 .o. Rule4Case1 .o. Rule5Case1 .o. Rule6Case3 .o. Rule11Case3 .o. Rule7Case4 .o. Rule8Case5 .o. Rule9Case4 .o. Rule1Case30 .o. Rule12Case1 .o. Rule12Case4 .o. Rule13Case6 .o. Rule13Case5 .o. Rule14Case1 .o. Rule15Case1 .o. Rule16Case4 .o. Rule18Case1 .o. Rule18Case2 .o. Rule18Case5 .o. Rule19Case2 .o. Rule19Case1;

# -------------
# Cleanup rules
# -------------

def CleanEdgeMarkers "$" -> 0;
def CleanDuplicated {--} -> {-};
def CleanWordEdgeHyphens "-" -> 0 || .#. _ .o. "-" -> 0 || _ .#.;

def Cleanup CleanEdgeMarkers .o. CleanDuplicated .o. CleanWordEdgeHyphens;

# ----------------------------
# Final syllabifier transducer
# ----------------------------

def Syllabifier Prep .o. AllRules .o. Cleanup;
regex Syllabifier;

down aeronave
down ambos
down aspas
down europa
down afta
down optar
down atlas
down amor
down calha
down meta
down raiva
down cairo
down queixar
down claustro
down adstrito
down praia
down piada
down viagem
down cairmos
down carta
down maldade
down contar
down esquerda
down aguardo
down varal
down cais
down cooperação
down bueiro
down sublime
down rapto
down democracia
down polícia
down sócio
down gamão
down burro
down besta
down teólogo
